Utah statutes.
62A-15-645.   Retrospective effect of provisions.

Patients who were in a mental health facility on May 8, 1951, shall be deemed to have been admitted under the provisions of this part appropriate in each instance, and their care, custody, and rights shall be governed by this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

